Utah statutes.
76-10-804.   Maintaining, committing or failing to remove public nuisance -- Classification of offense.

Every person who maintains or commits any public nuisance, the punishment for which is not otherwise prescribed, or who willfully omits to perform any legal duty relating to the removal of a public nuisance, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

